Washington statutes.
RCW 39.116.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Actual production facilities" means the final manufacturing facility and the facilities at which production processes occur that contribute to 70 percent or more of the product's cradle-to-gate global warming potential, as reflected in the environmental product declaration.

(2) "Awarding authority" means:

(a) Institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;

(b) The department of enterprise services, the department of natural resources, the state parks and recreation commission, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department of transportation; and

(c) Any other state government agency that receives funding from the omnibus capital appropriations act for a public works project contracted directly by the state agency.

(3) "Covered product" includes:

(a) Structural concrete products, including ready mix, shotcrete, precast, and concrete masonry units;

(b) Reinforcing steel products, specifically rebar and posttensioning tendons;

(c) Structural steel products, specifically hot rolled sections, hollow sections, metal deck, and plate; and

(d)(i) Engineered wood products, such as cross-laminated timber per ANSI form no. PRG 320, glulam beams, laminated veneer lumber, parallel strand lumber, dowel laminated timber, nail laminated timber, glulam laminated timber, prefabricated wood joists per ASTM D5055, wood structural panel per product standard 1 or product standard 2, solid sawn lumber per product standard 20, structural composite lumber per ASTM D5456, and structural sawn lumber.

(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (3)(d):

(A) "ANSI" means the American national standards institute.

(B) "ASTM" means the American society for testing and materials.

(C) "Product standard" means a voluntary product standard published by the United States department of commerce national institute of standards and technology.

(4) "Covered project" means:

(a) A construction project larger than 50,000 gross square feet as defined in the Washington state building code, chapter 51-50 WAC; or

(b) A building renovation project where the cost is greater than 50 percent of the assessed value and the project is larger than 50,000 gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space as defined in the Washington state building code, chapter 51-50 WAC.

(5) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(6) "Employee" means any individual who is in an employment relationship with the organization.

(7)(a) "Environmental product declaration" means a type III environmental product declaration, as defined by the international organization for standardization standard 14025 or similarly robust life-cycle assessment methods that have uniform standards in data collection consistent with the international organization for standardization standard 14025, industry acceptance, and integrity. When available, the environmental product declaration must be supply chain specific.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "supply chain specific" means an environmental product declaration that includes supply chain specific data for production processes that contribute 70 percent or more of a product's cradle-to-gate global warming potential, as defined in international organization for standardization standard 21930, and reports the overall percentage of supply chain specific data included.

(8) "Full time" means an employee in a position that:

(a) The employer intends to be filled for at least 52 consecutive weeks or 12 consecutive months, excluding any leaves of absence; and

(b) Requires the employee to work, excluding overtime hours, 35 hours per week for 52 consecutive weeks, 455 hours a quarter, or 1,820 hours during a period of 12 consecutive months.

(9) "Health product declaration" means a supply chain specific health product declaration, as defined by the health product declaration open standard maintained by the health product declaration collaborative, that has robust methods for product manufacturers and their ingredient suppliers to uniformly report and disclose information about product contents and associated health information.

(10) "Part time" means an employee in a position that:

(a) The employer intends to be filled for at least 52 consecutive weeks or 12 consecutive months, excluding any leaves of absence; and

(b) Working hours are less than those required for a full-time employee, as defined in this section.

(11) "Product and facility specific report" means an environmental product declaration whereby the environmental impacts can be attributed to a single manufacturer and a specific manufacturing or production facility.

(12)(a) "Scope 2 greenhouse gas emissions" are indirect greenhouse gas emissions associated with the purchase of electricity, steam, heat, or cooling.

(b) For purposes of this section, "greenhouse gas" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.45.010.

(13) "Supplier code of conduct" means a policy created by a manufacturer that outlines steps taken to ensure that its suppliers adhere to ethical practices, such as compliance with child and forced labor laws, antidiscrimination practices, freedom of association, and safe workplace conditions.

(14) "Temporary" means an employee in a position that is intended to be filled for a period of less than 52 consecutive weeks or 12 consecutive months. Positions in seasonal employment are temporary positions.

(15) "Total case incident rate" means the number of work-related injuries per 100 full-time equivalent workers during a one-year period, as defined by the occupational safety and health administration. Total case incident rate is calculated by multiplying the number of occupational safety and health administration recordable injuries and illnesses by 200,000 and dividing by number of hours worked by all employees.

(16) "Working conditions" means the average number of employees by employment type: Full time, part time, and temporary.

[ 2024 c 344 s 2.]